Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-171.02
Backgrounding lot, defined.

Backgrounding lot means a grow yard that is located within or outside of the brand inspection area and that prepares cattle for entry into a registered feedlot.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 3.
July 18, 2026